Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.440

Examination for telecommunications administrators' certificates.

It is the purpose and function of the board to establish and administer written examinations for telecommunications administrators' certificates. Examinations shall be designed to reasonably ensure that telecommunications administrators' certificate holders are competent to engage in and supervise the work regulated under this subchapter and their respective licenses. The examinations shall include questions to assure proper safety and protection for the general public. The department, with the consent of the board, is permitted to enter into a contract with a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and score these examinations. The fee for the examination may be set by the department in its contract with the professional testing agency. The department may direct that the applicant pay the fee to the professional testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and administering the examination.

[ 2000 c 238 s 208.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.